Colorado, session 2026A, SB049.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1619,
amend (2)(b), (3)(a), and (7)(b) introductory portion; and add (2)(f.5),
(2)(h), and (3)(c)(III.5) as follows:
24-33.5-1619. Natural disaster mitigation enterprise - fund -
goals - grant program - gifts, grants, or donations - legislative
declaration - definitions - repeal.
(2) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(b) "Eligible entity" means:
(I) A governing subdivision of the state, including counties,
municipalities, school districts, and special districts, that implements or
intends to implement natural disaster mitigation measures, or that is
applying for a federal grant that both requires matching funds and is
dedicated to assisting in the implementation of pre-disaster natural
disaster mitigation measures; OR
(II) A HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATION OR AN INDIVIDUAL
HOMEOWNER THAT IMPLEMENTS OR INTENDS TO IMPLEMENT NATURAL
DISASTER MITIGATION MEASURES.
(f.5) "IMPACT-RESISTANT ROOFING MATERIAL" MEANS A ROOFING
MATERIAL THAT HAS BEEN TESTED AND CERTIFIED THROUGH THE
UNDERWRITERS LABORATORIES 2218 STANDARD FOR IMPACT
RESISTANCE OF PREPARED ROOF COVERING MATERIALS AS A CLASS FOUR
-2- SB26-049

MATERIAL AND DESIGNED FOR HAIL RESISTANCE.
(h) "PROPERTY-SPECIFIC MITIGATION ACTION" MEANS A
SCIENCE-BASED MITIGATION ACTION AS DEMONSTRATED BY THE
"WILDFIRE PREPARED HOME" DESIGNATION FROM THE INSURANCE
INSTITUTE FOR BUSINESS AND HOME SAFETY OR BY A SIMILAR
MITIGATION PROGRAM THAT INCLUDES A VERIFICATION AND
CERTIFICATION PROCESS.
(3) Enterprise.
(a) There is hereby created in the department the natural disaster
mitigation enterprise. The enterprise is and operates as a
government-owned business within the department for the business
purpose of collecting the fee charged to certain insurers, and utilizing the
fee revenue to administer the grant program and to provide local
governments, HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATIONS, AND INDIVIDUAL
HOMEOWNERS technical assistance on natural disaster mitigation. The
enterprise exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions
under the department as if transferred to the department by a type 2
transfer, as defined in the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968",
article 1 of this title 24.
(c) The enterprise's primary powers and duties are to:
(III.5) PROVIDE GRANTS TO HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATIONS AND
INDIVIDUAL HOMEOWNERS TO INSTALL IMPACT-RESISTANT ROOFING AND
COMPLETE PROPERTY-SPECIFIC MITIGATION ACTIONS.
(7) Grant program.
(b) The purpose of the grant program is to achieve the goals
specified in subsection (6) of this section by assisting entities that are
implementing disaster mitigation measures, or that have applied for
-3- SB26-049

federal grants that both require matching funds and are dedicated to
assisting in the implementation of pre-disaster natural disaster mitigation
measures. The board may not award grants for renewable energy
generation projects, resources, or technologies. The board may award
grants for projects that include slope stabilization, watershed restoration,
fuels mitigation, drought mitigation, IMPACT-RESISTANT ROOFING
MATERIALS INSTALLATION, PROPERTY-SPECIFIC MITIGATION ACTIONS, and
similar activities that directly reduce risks to communities, lives, and
property. The board shall establish criteria to evaluate and prioritize
applications for grants, based on:
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-104, add
(4)(ff) as follows:
39-22-104. Income tax imposed on individuals, estates, and
trusts - single rate - report - tax preference performance statement
- legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(4) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income:
(ff) (I) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, BUT PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2037, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO
THE AMOUNT THAT A TAXPAYER CONTRIBUTED TO A CATASTROPHE
SAVINGS ACCOUNT DURING THE INCOME TAX YEAR, NOT TO EXCEED FIFTY
THOUSAND DOLLARS.
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND
DECLARES THAT:
(A) THE PURPOSE OF THE INCOME TAX SUBTRACTION CREATED IN
-4- SB26-049

THIS SUBSECTION (4)(ff) IS TO PROVIDE TAX RELIEF FOR CERTAIN
INDIVIDUALS, SPECIFICALLY TAXPAYERS WHO INVEST IN NATURAL
DISASTER MITIGATION; AND
(B) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL
MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE SUBTRACTION IN ACHIEVING THE
PURPOSE SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4)(ff) BASED ON THE NUMBER
AND AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF SUBTRACTIONS CLAIMED.
(III) A CATASTROPHE SAVINGS ACCOUNT IS NOT SUBJECT TO
ATTACHMENT, LEVY, GARNISHMENT, OR LEGAL PROCESS IN THE STATE.
(IV) INTEREST INCOME EARNED BY A CATASTROPHE SAVINGS
ACCOUNT SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM TAXATION.
(V) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4)(ff), UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(A) "CATASTROPHE SAVINGS ACCOUNT" MEANS A REGULAR
SAVINGS ACCOUNT OR MONEY MARKET ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED BY: A
TAXPAYER WHO IS AN INSURANCE POLICYHOLDER FOR RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY IN COLORADO TO COVER AN INSURANCE DEDUCTIBLE UNDER AN
INSURANCE POLICY FOR THE TAXPAYER'S LEGAL RESIDENCE THAT COVERS
ROOF REPLACEMENT WITH IMPACT-RESISTANT ROOFING MATERIALS,
PROPERTY-SPECIFIC MITIGATION ACTION, HAIL, WILDFIRE, OR OTHER
CATASTROPHIC WIND EVENT DAMAGE; BY A TAXPAYER TO COVER
SELF-INSURED LOSSES FOR THE TAXPAYER'S LEGAL RESIDENCE FROM HAIL,
WILDFIRE, OR OTHER CATASTROPHIC WIND EVENT; OR A TAXPAYER TO PAY
A QUALIFIED CATASTROPHE EXPENSE. A TAXPAYER MAY ESTABLISH ONLY
ONE CATASTROPHE SAVINGS ACCOUNT. THE SOLE PURPOSE OF THE
ACCOUNT, INCLUDING EARNED INTEREST, IS TO COVER THE AMOUNT OF
INSURANCE DEDUCTIBLES AND OTHER UNINSURED PORTIONS OF RISKS OF
-5- SB26-049

LOSS FROM HAIL, WILDFIRE, OR A CATASTROPHIC WIND EVENT OR A
QUALIFIED CATASTROPHE EXPENSE.
(B) "FORTIFIED" MEANS A HOMEBUILDING STANDARD PROGRAM
FROM THE INSURANCE INSTITUTE FOR BUSINESS AND HOME SAFETY OR A
SIMILAR ENTITY THAT RESEARCHES BUILDING MATERIALS SPECIFICALLY
DESIGNED TO PREVENT DAMAGE FROM NATURAL DISASTERS, INCLUDING
BUT NOT LIMITED TO HIGH WINDS, HURRICANES, HAILSTORMS, AND SEVERE
THUNDERSTORMS.
(C) "IMPACT-RESISTANT ROOFING MATERIALS" MEANS A ROOFING
MATERIAL THAT HAS BEEN TESTED AND CERTIFIED THROUGH THE
UNDERWRITERS LABORATORIES 2218 STANDARD FOR IMPACT
RESISTANCE OF PREPARED ROOF COVERING MATERIALS AS A CLASS FOUR
MATERIAL AND DESIGNED FOR HAIL RESISTANCE.
(D) "LEGAL RESIDENCE" MEANS THE RESIDENCE OF AN INDIVIDUAL
THAT IS THE PRINCIPAL OR PRIMARY HOME OR PLACE OF ABODE OF THE
INDIVIDUAL AND IS THE PLACE IN WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL'S HABITATION IS
FIXED. A LEGAL RESIDENCE MUST BE A PERMANENT BUILDING OR PART OF
A BUILDING AND MAY INCLUDE A HOUSE OR CONDOMINIUM. A VACANT
LOT OR BUSINESS ADDRESS IS NOT A LEGAL RESIDENCE.
(E) "PROPERTY-SPECIFIC MITIGATION ACTION" MEANS A
SCIENCE-BASED MITIGATION ACTION AS DEMONSTRATED BY THE
"WILDFIRE PREPARED HOME" DESIGNATION FROM THE INSURANCE
INSTITUTE FOR BUSINESS AND HOME SAFETY OR BY A SIMILAR
MITIGATION PROGRAM THAT INCLUDES A VERIFICATION AND
CERTIFICATION PROCESS.
(F) "QUALIFIED CATASTROPHE EXPENSES" MEANS EXPENSES PAID
OR INCURRED BY REASON OF PREPARATION FOR OR ROOF REPLACEMENT
-6- SB26-049

AND REPAIRS RELATED TO DAMAGE CAUSED BY HAIL, WILDFIRE, OR A
CATASTROPHIC WIND EVENT, INCLUDING THE ANNUAL COST OF A
FORTIFIED ENDORSEMENT TO SUPPLEMENT AN INSURANCE POLICY; THE
COST OF MITIGATION ACTIONS THAT WOULD REDUCE THE RISK OF
WILDFIRE, HAIL DAMAGE, OR OTHER CATASTROPHIC WIND EVENT DAMAGE;
OBTAINING EVALUATION SERVICES TO QUALIFY FOR A FORTIFIED
DESIGNATION; OR THE COST OF COMPLETING A PROPERTY-SPECIFIC
MITIGATION ACTION UNDER THE "WILDFIRE PREPARED HOME" PROGRAM
OR A SIMILAR MITIGATION PROGRAM THAT INCLUDES A VERIFICATION AND
CERTIFICATION PROCESS.
(VI) THIS SUBSECTION (4)(ff) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY
1, 2042.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-7- SB26-049